District of Columbia statutes.
47-4512

Audit of Program.

(a)

The Mayor shall audit the Program annually.

(b)

(1)

Within 90 days after the close of each fiscal year, the Chief Financial Officer shall submit to the Council a report, which shall include:

(A)

The Mayor’s audit report for the year;

(B)

A financial accounting of the Program, including:

(i)

The operating and administrative budget for the Program, which shall include a complete list of revenue sources and expenditures detailing the line-item expenditures;

(ii)

The number of accounts entered into during the previous fiscal year;

(iii)

Efforts by the Chief Financial Officer in marketing the Program; and

(iv)

Any recommendations of the Chief Financial Officer concerning the operation of the Program.

(2)

The Chief Financial Officer shall make available to each account owner a copy of a summary of the report and the option to purchase the full report at a nominal charge.

History

Mar. 31, 2001, D.C. Law 13-212, § 2(b), 47 DCR 9457
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 2402(j), 49 DCR 11664
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 267(c), 62 DCR 1884

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-307, in subsec. (b)(1), inserted “and the Advisory Board” after “Council”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 deleted “and the Advisory Board” following “to the Council” in (b)(1).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2402(j) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2402(j) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2402(j) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 267(c) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 267(c) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).